Louisiana, session 2026, HB137.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:40.1(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
14:40.1(A)(3) and (B)(3) and 92.2(A)(2)(g), (h), (i), and (j) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§40.1. Terrorizing; menacing
A.(1) Terrorizing is the intentional communication of information that the
commission of a crime of violence, as defined in R.S. 14:2(B), is imminent or in
progress or that a circumstance dangerous to human life exists or is about to exist,
with the intent of causing members of the general public to be in sustained fear for
their safety; or causing evacuation of a building, a public structure, or a facility of
transportation; or causing other serious disruption to the general public.
* * *
(3) Whoever commits the offense of terrorizing a school property, a school-
sponsored function, or a firearm-free zone shall be fined not more than fifteen
thousand dollars or imprisoned at hard labor for not less than five nor more than
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 137 ENROLLED
fifteen years without the benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of sentence, or
both.
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) Whoever commits the offense of menacing a school property, a school-
sponsored function, or a firearm-free zone shall be fined not more than one thousand
dollars or imprisoned with or without hard labor for not less than two years nor more
than five years, or both.
* * *
§92.2. Improper supervision of a minor by parent or legal custodian
A. Improper supervision of a minor by a parent or legal custodian, who has
care and control of the minor, includes any of the following:
* * *
(2) Through criminal negligence, or knowingly or willfully, permitting the
minor to do any of the following:
* * *
(g) Terrorize or menace a school in violation of R.S. 14:40.1.
(h) Communicate false information of a planned bombing on school property
in violation of R.S. 14:54.6.
(i) Regularly participate or engage in any crime of violence.
(j) Violate the terms or conditions of supervised release or the terms or
conditions of juvenile probation or parole.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 15:951(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§951. Back on Track Youth Pilot Program
* * *
E. For the purposes of this Section, "youth or youths" shall mean means a
person who has attained at least sixteen fourteen years of age and not more than
twenty-four years of age.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 137 ENROLLED
Section 3. R.S. 17:416.20.1 and 3996(B)(92) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§416.20.1. Information; terrorizing; Louisiana Department of Education; public
school distribution
A. The principal of each public school shall disseminate information during
the first five days of each school year to each student grades six and above regarding
the crime and consequences of terrorizing or menacing a school property, a school-
sponsored function, or a firearm-free zone as provided in R.S. 14:95.6. This
information may be incorporated into an existing orientation program. In addition
to each student, the information shall be provided to each student's parent or legal
guardian on a written form containing a signature line for each student's parent or
legal guardian to sign to acknowledge receipt and understanding of the information,
which the parent or legal guardian shall return to the school. The information
required by this Section shall be age and grade appropriate and shall give full
consideration as to whether the student is in a regular or special program of
education.
B. The Louisiana Department of Education shall develop the information
prescribed by this Section and provide it to each public school governing authority,
which shall disseminate it to each principal for this purpose.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 137 ENROLLED
(92) Information relative to terrorizing or menacing a school property, a
school-sponsored function, or a firearm-free zone, R.S. 17:416.20.1.
* * *
Section 4. Children's Code Article 897.1(D) through (G) are hereby amended and
reenacted and Children's Code Article 897.1(H) and (I) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 897.1. Disposition after adjudication of certain felony-grade delinquent acts
* * *
D.(1)(a) After adjudication of a felony-grade delinquent act based upon a
violation of R.S. 14:40.1 or R.S. 14:54.6, the court shall order the child who is
fourteen years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense to any or
all of the following:
(i) A mental examination, if one has not already been conducted pursuant to
R.S. 17:409.5.
(ii) Up to twelve months probation or no more than six months commitment
in a juvenile detention facility pursuant to Children's Code Article 898.
(iii) Participation in the Back on Track Youth Pilot Program as provided in
R.S. 15:951.
(b) After adjudication of a felony-grade delinquent act based upon a
violation of R.S. 14:40.1 or R.S. 14:54.6, the parent, custodian, or other legal
guardian of the child shall be subject to a civil fine of up to five thousand dollars.
(2)(a) After a second or subsequent adjudication of a felony-grade delinquent
act based upon a violation of R.S. 14:40.1 or R.S. 14:54.6, the court shall order the
child who is fourteen years of age or older at the time of the commission of the
offense to any or all of the following:
(i) A mental examination, if one has not already been conducted pursuant to
R.S. 17:409.5.
(ii) Up to eighteen months probation or no more nine months commitment
in a juvenile detention facility.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 137 ENROLLED
(iii) Participation in the Back on Track Youth Pilot Program as provided in
R.S. 15:951.
(b) After adjudication of a felony-grade delinquent act based upon a second
or subsequent violation of R.S. 14:40.1 or R.S. 14:54.6, the parent, custodian, or
other legal guardian shall be subject to a civil fine of not less than five thousand
dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars.
E.(1) In addition to the dispositions provided in Paragraph D of this Article,
the court shall conduct a hearing in accordance with Code of Criminal Procedure
Article 875.1 to make a determination regarding the financial ability of the child's
parent, legal guardian, or other person who is financially responsible for the care of
the child to reimburse the responding agency, local municipality, sheriff's
department, or any other governmental agency or political subdivision for all
incurred costs pertaining to the response, prosecution, or any other activities that
result from a violation of R.S. 14:40.1 or R.S. 14:54.6.
(2) If the court determines that payment in full of the aggregate amount of
all financial obligations imposed upon the child's parent, legal guardian, or other
person who is financially responsible for the care of the child would not cause
substantial financial hardship, the court shall order the person to reimburse the entity
described in Subparagraph (E)(1) of this Article.
D. F. Juveniles confined in secure placement for an adjudication as set forth
in Paragraph C of this Article shall be eligible for modification after serving
twenty-four months of the disposition or if the disposition is less than thirty-six
months, one-half of the disposition.
E. G. A motion for modification of a disposition shall be filed pursuant to
Article 910 et seq. and a contradictory hearing shall be set no sooner than thirty days
from the date of notice to the district attorney. To grant a motion for modification
of disposition, the court must shall find that the child poses a reduced risk to the
community based on the following considerations:
(1) The child has a favorable progress report from the placement facility.
(2) The child meets one of the following work or self-improvement criteria:
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 137 ENROLLED
(a) Has attained a high school diploma or equivalent.
(b) Is actively participating in workforce training or a certification program
and is in good standing as evidenced by grades and behavior notes submitted by the
child's instructors.
(3) The child has obtained a low-risk designation as determined by a valid
risk assessment procedure approved by the office of juvenile justice.
(4) The recommendation of the office of juvenile justice.
(5) A reentry plan that includes an appropriate placement to conduct
supervision and achieve aftercare goals.
(6) Any additional evidence provided by the child, the state, or the office of
juvenile justice.
F. H. At least six months prior to the release of the child, the department
shall prepare an individualized and thorough transitional plan that identifies the
techniques, programs, personnel, and facilities that will be used to assist the child in
achieving a successful return to his family and the community. A copy of the
transitional plan shall be mailed to the court that ordered the disposition of
commitment.
G. I. The provisions of this Article shall apply to all children in the custody
of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of juvenile justice, on or
after August 1, 2018.
Section 5. This Act shall be known and may be cited as "The School Threat
Accountability and Safety Act".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.